Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4955.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 138.664, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 81a. new text end new text begin Quality Learing Center. new text end new text begin Quality Learing Center, Hennepin County. new text end